Illinois, session 104th, HB3590.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-13-30 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)7    Sec. 11-13-30. Temporary stormwater storage. 8Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the use 9of open space for temporary stormwater storage is allowed and 10does not constitute a change in use. Temporary stormwater 11storage does not interfere with a requirement that the 12property must be open to the public for recreation use. In this 13Section, "temporary stormwater storage" means a detention 14basin or other system designed to temporarily collect, hold, 15and remove stormwater runoff. 16    Section 10. The Open Space Lands Acquisition and 17Development Act is amended by adding Section 15 as follows: 18    (525 ILCS 35/15 new)19    Sec. 15. Temporary stormwater storage. Notwithstanding any 20provision of law to the contrary, the use of open space for 21temporary stormwater storage is allowed and does not   HB3590- 2 -LRB104 09472 BDA 19533 b1constitute a change in use. Temporary stormwater storage does 2not interfere with a requirement that the property must be 3open to the public for recreation use. In this Section, 4"temporary stormwater storage" means a detention basin or 5other system designed to temporarily collect, hold, and remove 6stormwater runoff.